Maryland, session 2025, HB1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
2–411.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or [§ 2–408(d)] § 2–408(E) of
this subtitle, the charter or bylaws of a corporation, or any agreement to which the
corporation is a party and which has been approved by the board of directors, may provide
for:
(1) The establishment of one or more standing committees or for the
creation of one or more committees upon the occurrence of certain events; and
(2) The composition of the membership, and the qualifications and the
voting and other rights of members of any such committee, subject to the continued service
of members of the committee as directors.
3–104.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, unless the charter or
bylaws of a corporation provide otherwise by reference to this section or the subject matter
of this section, the approval of the stockholders is not required for any:
– 1 –

Ch. 111 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Transfer of assets by a corporation in the ordinary course of business
actually conducted by it or as a distribution as defined in § 2–301 of this article;
(2) Mortgage, pledge, or creation of any other security interest in any or all
of the assets of a corporation, whether or not in the ordinary course of its business;
(3) Transfer of assets by a corporation to one or more persons if all of the
equity interests of the person or persons are owned, directly or indirectly, by the
corporation;
(4) Transfer of assets by a corporation registered as an open–end
investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, including a transfer
between or among classes or series of stock of a corporation; or
(5) Transfer of assets by a corporation that is dissolved.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subtitle, unless the charter or
bylaws of a corporation provide otherwise by reference to this section or the subject matter
of this section, the approval of the stockholders and articles of share exchange are not
required for an exchange of shares of stock through voluntary action or under an agreement
with the stockholders participating in the exchange.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, UNLESS
THE CHARTER OR BYLAWS OF A CORPORATION PROVIDE OTHERWISE BY REFERENCE
TO THIS SECTION OR THE SUBJECT MATTER OF THIS SECTION, THE APPROVAL OF
THE STOCKHOLDERS IS NOT REQUIRED FOR A TRANSFER OF ASSETS THAT IS
COLLATERAL FOR SECURING A MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, OR SECURITY INTEREST IF:
(1) THE MORTGAGEE, PLEDGEE, OR SECURED PARTY EXERCISES ITS
RIGHTS UNDER:
(I) TITLE 9 OF THE MARYLAND UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE;
(II) THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(III) OTHER APPLICABLE LAW TO EFFECT THE TRANSFER OF
ASSETS WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE CORPORATION; OR
(2) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE CORPORATION AUTHORIZES
AN ALTERNATIVE SALE OF ASSETS WITH THE MORTGAGEE, THE PLEDGEE, A
SECURED PARTY, OR ANOTHER PERSON:
(I) THAT RESULTS IN THE REDUCTION OR ELIMINATION OF
THE LIABILITIES OR OBLIGATIONS SECURED BY THE ASSETS; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(II) FOR WHICH THE VALUE OF THE ASSETS IS LESS THAN OR
EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF THE LIABILITIES OR OBLIGATIONS BEING REDUCED OR
ELIMINATED.
(D) THE RECEIPT OF CONSIDERATION BY THE CORPORATION OR ITS
STOCKHOLDERS IN AN ALTERNATIVE SALE OF ASSETS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT CREATE A PRESUMPTION THAT THE
VALUE OF THE ASSETS IS GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT OF LIABILITIES OR
OBLIGATIONS BEING ELIMINATED OR REDUCED FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
SECTION.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY PROCEEDING
AGAINST A CORPORATION AND ANOTHER NECESSARY PARTY TO ENJOIN A SALE
BEFORE THE SALE IS COMPLETED.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FAILURE TO
SATISFY SUBSECTION (C)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT INVALIDATE A SALE IF
THE TRANSFEREE OF THE ASSETS:
(I) PROVIDED VALUE FOR THE ASSETS, INCLUDING THE
REDUCTION OR ELIMINATION OF THE LIABILITIES OR OBLIGATIONS SECURED BY
THE ASSETS; AND
(II) ACTED IN GOOD FAITH.
(3) PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED
TO ELIMINATE ANY LIABILITY FOR MONETARY DAMAGES ARISING FROM CLAIM,
INCLUDING:
(I) A CLAIM THAT FOR MONETARY DAMAGES ARISING FROM
THE DIRECTOR DID NOT FAILING TO SATISFY THE STANDARD OF CONDUCT FOR
DIRECTORS UNDER § 2–405.1(C) OF THIS ARTICLE, INCLUDING A CLAIM BY OR IN
THE RIGHT OF THE CORPORATION; OR
(II) A CLAIM FOR EQUITABLE RELIEF.
[(c)] (F) A transaction described in subsection (a) [or], (b), OR (C) of this section
also may be effected as otherwise provided in this subtitle.
3–109.
(d) In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, articles of
merger shall include:
– 3 –

Ch. 111 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) (i) Any amendment to the charter, certificate of limited partnership,
articles of organization, or declaration of trust of the successor to be effected as part of the
merger; and
(ii) The restatement, if a restatement of the charter, the certificate
of limited partnership, articles of organization, or declaration of trust of the successor is to
be effected as a part of the merger;
(2) As to each corporation party to the articles:
(i) The total number of shares of stock of all classes or series which
the corporation has authority to issue;
(ii) The number of shares of stock of each class or series;
(iii) The par value of the shares of stock of each class or series or a
statement that the shares are without par value; and
(iv) If there are any shares of stock with par value, the aggregate par
value of all the shares of all classes or series;
(3) As to each business trust party to the articles:
(i) The total number of shares of beneficial interest of all classes and
series which the business trust has authority to issue; and
(ii) The number of shares of beneficial interest of each class and
series;
(4) [As to each limited partnership party to the articles:
(i) The percentages of partnership interest of each class or series of
partnership interest of the limited partnership; and
(ii) The class of partners and the respective percentage of
partnership interests in each class or series of partnership interest;
(5) As to each limited liability company party to the articles:
(i) The percentages of membership interest of each class or series of
membership interest of the limited liability company; and
(ii) The class of members and the respective percentage of
membership interests in each class or series of membership interest;
(6) As to each partnership party to the articles:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(i) The percentages of partnership interest of each class or series of
partnership interest of the partnership; and
(ii) The class of partners and the respective percentage of
partnership interests in each class or series of partnership interest;
(7)] If the charter[, certificate of limited partnership, articles of
organization,] or declaration of trust of the successor is amended in a manner which
changes any of the information required by items (2) [through (5)] AND (3) of this
subsection, that information as it was both immediately before and as changed by the
merger; and
[(8)] (5) The manner and basis of converting or exchanging issued shares
of stock of the merging corporations, outstanding partnership interest of the merging
partnership or limited partnership, or shares of beneficial interest of the merging business
trusts into different stock of a corporation, partnership interest of a partnership or limited
partnership, outstanding membership interest of a limited liability company, shares of
beneficial interest of a business trust, or other consideration, and the treatment of any
issued shares of stock of the merging corporations, partnership interest of the merging
partnership or limited partnerships, membership interest of the merging limited liability
company, or shares of beneficial interest of the merging business trusts not to be converted
or exchanged, any or all of which may be made dependent on facts ascertainable outside
the articles of merger.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 5 –